Illinois, session 104th, SB2126.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Sections 15-41 and 18-184.25 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-41 new)7    Sec. 15-41. Faith-based organizations. Property that is 8owned by a faith-based organization or an organization 9described under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code 10of 1986 that is leased for a minimum of 50 years for the 11purpose of, and is predominantly used for, providing 12affordable housing for households with a household income of 13between 20% and 90% of the area median income is exempt from 14taxation under this Code until (i) the end of the ground lease 15term or (ii) the first taxable year during which the property 16is no longer used for affordable housing purposes, whichever 17occurs first. 18    (35 ILCS 200/18-184.25 new)19    Sec. 18-184.25. Affordable housing abatement. Any taxing 20district, upon a majority vote of its governing authority, 21may, after the determination of the assessed valuation of its 22property, order the clerk of that county to abate all or a   SB2126- 2 -LRB104 06941 HLH 16978 b1portion of its taxes on affordable housing developments that 2are subject to an affordable housing agreement with a unit of 3local government. If the affordable housing development serves 4households with a household income of between 70% and 90% of 5the area median income, then the amount of the abatement may 6not exceed 80% of the property taxes levied by the taxing 7district. If the affordable housing development serves 8households with a household income of between 20% and 69% of 9the area median income, then the taxing district may abate all 10of its taxes on the property.